Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7230.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 25-2 of the General Laws entitled "Days of Special Observance" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
25-2-62. Rhode Island native plant month.
The month of May shall annually be set apart as a month to be known as "Rhode Island
Native Plant Month." The month shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate
ceremonies and activities to recognize as well as educate people about the importance and history
of Rhode Island's native plants and the need to preserve them.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004074
========